Wyoming statutes. Title 9 Administration of the Government
Article 9. Refunding Bonds

Cross references. —

For constitutional provision requiring endorsements on bonds and other evidences of indebtedness, see art. 16, § 8, Wyo. Const.

For General Obligation Public Securities Refunding Law, see §

16-5-101

et seq.

As to refunding bonds in connection with power districts, see §

37-7-127

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

81A C.J.S. States §§ 252 to 262.

§ 9-4-901.
Issuance; principal amount.

Whenever the state of Wyoming has outstanding bonds which are redeemable by their terms or which may be redeemed with the consent of the holders thereof, the governor, with the approval of the state treasurer and attorney general, may issue refunding bonds of the state of Wyoming to be designated “State of Wyoming Refunding Bonds, Series (year)”, in a principal amount not exceeding the principal amount of the bonds to be refunded.

History.

Laws 1939, ch. 99, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 20-1101; W.S. 1957, § 9-620; W.S. 1977, § 9-7-1201; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1999, ch. 150, § 2.

Law reviews. —

For article, “Administration of the General Property Tax in Wyoming,” see 4 Wyo. L.J. 227.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Implied power to issue refunding bonds, 1 ALR2d 134.

§ 9-4-902.
Interest rate; maturity; form; record.

If bonds are issued to refund bonds which are redeemable, the interest rate thereon shall be lower than the rate on the bonds to be refunded. If bonds are issued to refund bonds prior to their redeemable date, the interest rate thereon shall not be greater than that of the outstanding bonds to the redemption date, after which time the interest rate on refunding bonds shall be lower than the rate on the bonds to be refunded.

State refunding bonds shall mature serially, either annually or semiannually, in amounts determined by the governor, state treasurer and attorney general. The first maturity shall be not later than three (3) years and the last maturity not later than fifteen (15) years after the date of the bonds. Principal and interest shall be payable in lawful money of the United States of America at the office of the state treasurer and at other places designated in the bonds. Bonds shall be issued in the denomination of one thousand dollars ($1,000.00) or some multiple thereof and shall be signed by the governor, attested by the secretary of state under the seal of the state, and countersigned by the state treasurer. Semiannual interest coupons to be attached to the bonds shall bear the facsimile signature of the state treasurer. The proceedings for the issuance and the form of the bonds shall be approved by the attorney general, and each bond shall have endorsed thereon a certificate signed by the auditor and secretary of state that the bond is issued pursuant to law and is within the debt limit. Refunding bonds shall be numbered from one (1) upward, and shall be paid in that order. The state treasurer shall keep a record of all bonds issued hereunder in a book to be kept in his office for that purpose.

History.

Laws 1939, ch. 99, § 2; C.S. 1945, § 20-1102; W.S. 1957, § 9-621; W.S. 1977, § 9-7-1202; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

Cross references. —

As to interest rates generally, see § 40-14-106(e).

§ 9-4-903.
Sale or exchange; price; application of proceeds.

The governor and state treasurer may sell refunding bonds at a price not less than the par value thereof and shall apply the proceeds thereof solely to the payment of a like amount of the bonds to be refunded or refunding bonds may be exchanged for a like amount of outstanding bonds. Refunding bonds may be sold or exchanged all at one time, or singly, or in blocks from time to time as determined by the governor and state treasurer, but they shall not be issued unless and until a like amount of outstanding bonds can be paid, redeemed and cancelled.

History.

Laws 1939, ch. 99, § 3; C.S. 1945, § 20-1103; W.S. 1957, § 9-622; W.S. 1977, § 9-7-1203; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

§ 9-4-904.
Tax levy to pay principal and interest.

The state board of equalization shall, each year at the time of making the annual levy for state purposes, direct the boards of county commissioners of the several counties of the state to levy upon all taxable property therein a tax, which, with other funds available for the purpose, is sufficient to pay the principal of and the interest on refunding bonds as the bonds respectively become due and payable. The tax shall be payable in cash, and when paid shall be remitted to the state treasurer to be credited to the debt service fund for the purpose of paying the principal of and the interest on the refunding bonds.

History.

Laws 1939, ch. 99, § 4; C.S. 1945, § 20-1104; W.S. 1957, § 9-623; Laws 1974, ch. 16, § 2; W.S. 1977, § 9-7-1204; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

Repealing clauses. —

Section 5, ch. 99, Laws 1939, repeals all laws and parts of laws in conflict with that act.